Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-124
Bonds; guaranty companies; failure to pay judgment; penalty.

If any such corporation fails, neglects, or refuses to pay any fine, judgment, or decree rendered against it upon any such recognizance, stipulation, bond, or undertaking, from which no appeal, writ of error, or supersedeas is taken for ninety days after the entry of such judgment or decree, it shall forfeit all rights to do business in this state until such judgment or decree is fully paid or satisfied.

Laws 1895, c. 22, § 3, p. 123;

R.S.1913, § 5730;

C.S.1922, § 5059;

C.S.1929, § 12-123;

R.S.1943, § 11-124;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 1.